Maine, session 132, LD6.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12254, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 655, Pt. B, §216 and
affected by §422, is amended to read:
1. Prohibition. A person may not set a trap for any wild animal without having the
trap plainly labeled with that person's full name and address or that person's trapping online
licensing system identification number issued by the department.
Page 1 - 132LR0315(03)